Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-920
Research activities, defined.

Research activities shall mean those activities intended to create new knowledge or provide for the application of existing or newly created knowledge. Research activities may be carried out in conjunction with a system or area's instructional program or as a separately identifiable activity.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 4.